Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Shares

§ 17-16-601.
Authorized shares.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth the classes of shares and series of shares within a class, and the number, which may be unlimited, of shares of each class and series that the corporation is authorized to issue. If more than one (1) class or series of shares is authorized, the articles of incorporation shall prescribe a distinguishing designation for each class or series, and shall prescribe, prior to the issuance of shares of a class or series, the terms, including preferences, rights and limitations of that class or series. Except to the extent varied as permitted by this section, all shares of a class or series shall have terms, including preferences, rights and limitations that are identical with those of other shares of the same class or series.

The articles of incorporation shall authorize:

One (1) or more classes or series of shares that together have unlimited voting rights; and

One (1) or more classes or series of shares, which may be the same class or classes as those with voting rights, that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution.

The articles of incorporation may authorize one (1) or more classes or series of shares that:

Have special, conditional, or limited voting rights, or no right to vote, except to the extent otherwise provided by this act;

Are redeemable or convertible as specified in the articles of incorporation:

At the option of the corporation, the shareholder, or another person or upon the occurrence of a specified event;

For cash, indebtedness, securities, or other property; and

At prices and in amounts specified or determined in accordance with a formula.

Entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative; or

Have preference over any other class or series of shares with respect to distributions, including distributions upon the dissolution of the corporation.

Terms of shares may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of incorporation.

Any of the terms of shares may vary among holders of the same class or series so long as such variations are expressly set forth in the articles of incorporation.

The description of the preferences, rights and limitations of classes or series of shares in subsection (c) of this section is not exhaustive.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to bank stock requirements, see §

13-2-301

et seq.

As to trust company stock, see §

13-5-105

.

As to savings and loan association stock, see §

13-6-203

.

As to issuance of securities by gas and electric companies, see chapter 6 of title 37.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or series” or variants following “class” or variants throughout the section; in (a), substituted “set forth” for “prescribe”, inserted “and series of shares within a class” and “and series” in the first sentence, inserted “shall prescribe” and substituted “the terms, including preferences, rights and limitations of that class or series” for “the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of that class shall be described in the articles of incorporation” in the second sentence, and added “Except to the extent varied as permitted by this section” at the beginning and substituted “terms, including preferences, rights and limitations that are identical with those of other shares of the same class or series” for “preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same class except to the extent otherwise permitted by
W.S.

17-16-602

” in the last sentence; substituted “otherwise provided” for “prohibited” in (c)(i); substituted “specified event” for “designated event” in (c)(ii)(A); rewrote (c)(ii)(C), which read: “In a designated amount or in an amount determined in accordance with a designated formula or by reference to extrinsic data or events”; deleted “dividends and” preceding “distributions” in (c)(iv); redesignated former (d) as present (f) and added present (d) and (e); substituted “preferences, rights and limitations of classes or series of shares” for “designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of share classes” in (f); and made stylistic and related changes.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutory requirements respecting issuance of corporate stock as applicable to foreign corporation, 8 ALR2d 1185.

Agent's agreement to repurchase stock sold by him, 34 ALR2d 510.

Meaning and import of “book value” of corporate stock, 51 ALR2d 606.

Failure to issue stock as factor in disregard of corporate entity, 8 ALR3d 1122.

Validity of charter provision for nonvoting common stock, 52 ALR3d 1131.

§ 17-16-602.
Terms of class or series determined by board of directors.

If the articles of incorporation so provide, the board of directors is authorized, without shareholder approval, to:

Classify any unissued shares into one (1) or more classes or into one (1) or more series within a class;

Reclassify any unissued shares of any class into one (1) or more classes or into one (1) or more series within one (1) or more classes; or

Reclassify any unissued shares of any series of any class into one (1) or more classes or into one (1) or more series within a class.

If the board of directors acts pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, it shall determine the terms, including the preferences, rights and limitations, to the same extent permitted under W.S.

17-16-601

, of:

Any class of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class; or

Any series within a class before the issuance of any shares of that series.

Before issuing any shares of a class or series created under this section, the corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment effecting the provisions of this section in accordance with article 10 of this act and setting forth the terms determined under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a), (b), and (d).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of cancellation of accrued dividends on preferred corporate stock, 8 ALR2d 893.

Preferred stockholders' rights to dividends upon liquidation or dissolution, 25 ALR2d 788.

Dividends on preferred stock, 27 ALR2d 1073.

Reduction of preferred stock, 35 ALR2d 1149.

§ 17-16-603.
Issued and outstanding shares.

A corporation may issue the number of shares of each class or series authorized by the articles of incorporation. Shares that are issued are outstanding shares until they are reacquired, redeemed, converted, or cancelled.

The reacquisition, redemption, or conversion of outstanding shares is subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this section and to W.S.

17-16-640

.

At all times that shares of the corporation are outstanding, one (1) or more shares that together have unlimited voting rights and one (1) or more shares that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution shall be outstanding.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of creditors of corporation with respect to its purchase or acquisition of its own stock, 47 ALR2d 758.

Validity, construction and effect of provisions of articles of incorporation or stock certificates relating to call, redemption or retirement of common stock, 48 ALR2d 392.

Power to change existing redemption rights of common stock shareholders, 70 ALR2d 843.

§ 17-16-604.
Fractional shares.

A corporation may:

Issue fractions of a share or pay in money the value of fractions of a share;

Arrange for disposition of fractional shares by the shareholders; or

Issue scrip in registered or bearer form entitling the holder to receive a full share upon surrendering enough scrip to equal a full share.

Each certificate representing scrip shall be conspicuously labeled “scrip” and shall contain the information required by W.S. 17-16-625(b).

The holder of a fractional share is entitled to exercise the rights of a shareholder, including the right to vote, to receive dividends, and to participate in the assets of the corporation upon liquidation. The holder of scrip is not entitled to any of these rights unless the scrip provides for them.

The board of directors may authorize the issuance of scrip subject to any condition considered desirable, including:

That the scrip will become void if not exchanged for full shares before a specified date; and

That the shares for which the scrip is exchangeable may be sold and the proceeds paid to the scripholders.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-605.
Construction of terms relating to stock and certificate tokens.

As used in this title, any reference to:

Share certificate, share, stock, share of stock or words of similar import shall be construed to include a certificate token;

A requirement to print information on a share certificate or words of similar import shall be construed to be satisfied if the information satisfies the requirements set forth in W.S. 17-16-625(g);

Certificated shares or words of similar import shall be construed to include shares represented by certificate tokens, and any reference to the delivery or deposit of these shares to the corporation shall be construed to refer to any method of granting control of the tokens to the corporation;

A certificate being duly endorsed or words of similar import shall be construed to mean that the transaction authorizing transfer of control of the certificate token was signed by the lawful holder of the token with the network signature corresponding to the lawful holder’s data address to which the certificate token was issued or last lawfully transferred.

History.

2019 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date.
—

Laws 2019, ch. 93 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.